Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Interstate Ferries and Ferries Not Connecting With State Primary Road System

280.170.
Application of KRS 280.180 to 280.290.

The provisions of KRS

280.180

to

280.290

do not apply to ferries for which a certificate of convenience and necessity is required under KRS

280.020

.

280.180.
Establishment of ferries — Granting and sale of ferry privileges. [Repealed.]

280.190.
Distances between ferries — Establishment in cities — Unauthorized competition. [Repealed.]

280.200.
Bond of owner or operator of ferry. [Repealed.]

280.210.
Condemnation of land for ferry purposes.

If any applicant for a ferry privilege owns or has the right to use the land proposed as the site of the ferry only on one (1) side of the stream, and the landing on the opposite side is not at an established public highway, the applicant may, pursuant to the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky, condemn the necessary right-of-way, not more than forty (40) feet wide, for the use of the ferry.

Any person having an established ferry on any river in this state may have condemned, for a period of twenty (20) years or permanently, at his option, not more than one-half (1/2) acre of land adjacent to the ferry for any purpose necessary for the use of the ferry pursuant to the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

History.

1805, 1821: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 115.

280.220.
Revocation of ferry privilege.

If the grantee of a ferry privilege does not, within six (6) months after the grant, put and keep the required boats and hands in use, the county judge/executive shall, after notice to him, revoke his grant.

Any failure for one (1) year to keep up a ferry in the manner required, or any sale or lease of a ferry privilege made to, or contract not to use a ferry privilege made with, the owner, tenant or partner of a ferry established within one (1) mile thereof, or the owner, tenant or partner of a ferry established on the other side of the Ohio River or Mississippi River, shall be deemed an abandonment of the ferry privilege, and the county judge/executive shall, upon notice to the grantee, revoke his ferry privilege.

History.

1808, 1810 to 1812: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 199; 1978, ch. 384, § 458, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 331, § 43, effective July 15, 1986.

280.230.
Grant of unclaimed or abandoned ferry privilege to another.

If no owner of the land on either side of the stream over which a public highway passes will obtain the ferry privilege, or if such an owner, after obtaining the privilege, abandons it or fails to keep it up according to law, the county judge/executive may, after reasonable notice, grant the privilege to another. When it is necessary to the proper exercise of the privilege by such grantee, an action may be brought to condemn permanently, or for not more than twenty (20) years, at the option of the owner of the privilege, not more than two (2) acres of ground adjoining the landing, together with the use, for ferry purposes, of any adjacent uninclosed bank of the stream. Condemnation shall be pursuant to the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

History.

1806: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 116; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 262, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 459, effective June 17, 1978.

280.240.
County judge/executive to prescribe number and kind of boats and number of hands.

At the time of granting any ferry privilege, the county judge/executive shall prescribe the number and kind of boats to be kept, the number of hands to be employed, and how the boats shall be propelled, and may, once in each year thereafter, change the same, after notice to the person granted the privilege. Where the rapidity of the current does not require the ferry boat to be propelled by poles, the court shall prescribe that the boat shall have a substantial railing at least two (2) feet high on its sides.

History.

1809: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 263, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 460, effective June 17, 1978.

280.250.
Rates of toll.

At the time of granting any ferry privilege, the county judge/executive shall fix the rates of toll to be charged at the ferry, which shall be in the following proportions: For every heavy four (4) wheeled wagon, carriage or coach and driver, the same as for six (6) horses; for every light or open four (4) wheeled carriage or light wagon and driver, the same as for four (4) horses; for every two (2) wheeled carriage or cart and driver, the same as for two (2) horses; for every hogshead of tobacco, not in a wagon or cart, the same as for one (1) horse; for every head of neat-cattle, the same as for one (1) horse; for every sheep, goat, hog or lamb, one-fifth (1/5) as much as for a horse.

The rates may be changed by order from time to time, but before an increase may be made reasonable notice of the application must be given to the county attorney, or posted for at least one (1) month on the courthouse door, and before a reduction may be made the county attorney must have written notice served on the owner of the ferry.

No owner or keeper of a ferry, or agent or servant thereof, shall demand or take from any person a greater toll than that allowed by the order of the county judge/executive fixing the rates of toll at his ferry. A violation of this provision by a keeper, agent or servant shall be deemed a violation by the owner.

History.

1813, 1814: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 264, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 461, effective June 17, 1978.

280.260.
Ferry service to be prompt.

No owner or keeper of a ferry shall, in person or by agents, without a reasonable excuse, fail to give immediate ferry service to each person applying for it, except that there may be a reasonable delay between trips.

History.

1815.

280.270.
Waiting rooms for passengers.

Every person operating any ferry boat, by steam or other similar power, across the Ohio or Mississippi River, shall furnish and maintain a floating or stationary waiting room on the Kentucky shore, not more than three hundred (300) feet from the ferry landing, sufficient to accommodate the passengers and protect them from the weather.

History.

1809a.

280.280.
Ferry owner or lessee to grade and pave banks of stream where road crosses.

The owner or lessee of any ferry operated for compensation on a stream in this state at a point where it is crossed by a road or public highway not maintained by the state shall grade the banks of the stream and pave them with a hard surface, at least sixteen (16) feet wide, from the low water mark of the stream to the high water mark or the top of each bank in the road, and shall maintain the hard surface.

History.

1821a-1.

280.290.
Appeals in ferry cases.

Any person interested may appeal from any order of the county judge/executive concerning a ferry or ferry rates to the Circuit Court of the county, and thence to the Court of Appeals, both of which shall have jurisdiction of law and fact, but the Court of Appeals of only such facts as are certified from the Circuit Court. The appeal shall be prosecuted to the Circuit Court within thirty (30) days from the making of the order, and to the Court of Appeals in accordance with the Rules of Civil Procedure. The county attorney may take an appeal in the name of the Commonwealth from any order of the county judge/executive concerning a ferry or ferry rates, but only if some person becomes responsible to the adverse party for the cost incident thereto.

The Circuit Court shall hear each appeal brought under subsection (1) of this section as an original case, and may command the county judge/executive to enter an order in conformity with the judgment of the Circuit Court.

History.

1801, 1817: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 265, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 462, effective June 17, 1978.